lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Žolės riedulys ir lakrosas > Lakroso treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Lakroso atbulinės eigos sistemos; Lakroso atšokimo treniruokliai; Lakroso atmušikliai; Lakroso šaudymo taikiniai; Lakroso treniruočių manekenai
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้าและลาครอส > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมลาครอส: ตาข่ายดักลูกลาครอสส์; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมการเด้งกลับในลาครอส; กระดานเด้งลูกลาครอส; เป้าซ้อมยิงลาครอสส์; หุ่นจำลองฝึกซ้อมลาครอสส์
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Landhockey och lacrosse > Lacrosseträningsutrustning: Stoppnätssystem för lacrosse; Returtränare för lacrosse; Lacrossereturnerare; Skottmål för lacrosse; Träningsdockor för lacrosse
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Hockey su prato e lacrosse > Attrezzatura di allenamento per lacrosse: Reti di fondo per lacrosse; Scarpe da ginnastica rimbalzanti per Lacrosse; Reti da rimbalzo per lacrosse; Bersagli per tiri da lacrosse; Sagome da allenamento per lacrosse
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Maahockey ja lacrosse > Lacrosse-harjoitteluvälineet: Lacrosse-taustaverkkojärjestelmät; Lacrosse-palautusharjoitteluvälineet; Lacrosse-palauttimet; Lacrosse-heittomaalit; Lacrosse-harjoitusnuket
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Lacrosse e hóquei em campo > Auxiliares de treino para lacrosse: Sistemas de proteção de fundo de lacrosse; Artigos de treino de ressalto para lacrosse; Rebotes de lacrosse; Alvos de lançamento de lacrosse; Bonecos de treino de lacrosse
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 草地曲棍球/袋棍球 > 袋棍球訓練輔助用品: 袋棍球擋網系統; 袋棍球彈力練習網; 袋棍球練習網; 袋棍球射門標靶; 袋棍球訓練假人
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Khúc côn cầu trên cỏ và bóng vợt > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng vợt: Hệ thống lưới chắn bóng lacrosse; Khung bật lại tập luyện bóng vợt; Lưới bật lại tập luyện bóng vợt; Mục tiêu tập ném lacrosse; Hình nộm tập luyện lacrosse
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Hokej na trawie i lacrosse > Sprzęt treningowy do lacrosse: Siatki ochronne do lacrosse; Odbijacze treningowe do lacrosse; Odbijacze do lacrosse; Cele do strzałów do lacrosse; Fantomy treningowe do lacrosse
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィールドホッケー・ラクロス用品 > ラクロス練習器具: ラクロス用バックストップシステム; ラクロス用バウンスバックトレーナー; ラクロス用リバウンダー; ラクロス用シューティングターゲット; ラクロス用トレーニングダミー
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Feldhockey & Lacrosse > Lacrosse-Trainingszubehör: Lacrosse-Auffangnetze; Lacrosse Bounce-Back-Trainer; Lacrosse-Rebounder; Lacrosse-Wurfziele; Lacrosse-Trainingsdummies
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Pozemní hokej a lakros > Tréninkové pomůcky na lakros: Záchytné sítě na lakros; Odrážecí branky na trénink lakrosu; Odrážecí trenažéry na trénink lakrosu; Střelecké terče na lakros; Tréninkové figuríny na lakros
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Çim Hokeyi ve Lakros > Lakros Eğitim Ekipmanları: Lakros güvenlik filesi sistemleri; Lakros Geri Dönme Eğitmenleri; Lakros Ribaundçuları; Lakros şut hedefleri; Lakros antrenman mankenleri
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Hockey en lacrosse > Benodigdheden voor lacrossetraining: Vangnetsystemen voor lacrosse; Bounce-backtrainers voor lacrosse; Rebounders voor lacrosse; Schietdoelen voor lacrosse; Trainingspoppen voor lacrosse
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Hokej na travi in lacrosse > Pripomočki za vadbo lacrossa: Sistemi za zadrževalne pregrade za lacrosse; Naprave za odboj žoge pri lacrossu; Naprave za odbijanje žoge za lacrosse; Tarče za strele za lacrosse; Lutke za vadbo lacrossa
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Хокей на трева и лакрос > Помощни средства за тренировка по лакрос: Системи за спиране на топки за лакрос; Симулатори за отработване на хвърлянето за лакрос; Мрежи за рикошет за лакрос; Мишени за стрелба за лакрос; Тренировъчни манекени за лакрос
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Hockey sur gazon et lacrosse > Matériel d'entraînement de lacrosse: Pare-balles de crosse; Entraînement au rebondissement de lacrosse; Filets de rebond de lacrosse; Cibles de tir de crosse; Mannequins d'entraînement de crosse
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 陆上曲棍球/长曲棍球 > 长曲棍球训练器材: 长曲棍球挡网系统; 长曲棍球弹力训练鞋; 长曲棍球反弹器; 长曲棍球射门标靶; 长曲棍球训练假人
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse > Articole pentru antrenament lacrosse: Sisteme de oprire a mingii pentru lacrosse; Pantofi de antrenament cu ricoșeu pentru lacrosse; Plase ricoșeu pentru lacrosse; Ținte de tragere pentru lacrosse; Manechine de antrenament pentru lacrosse
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей на траве и лакросс > Тренировочный инвентарь для лакросса: Заградительные сетки для лакросса; Тренажеры для отработки бросков; Тренажеры-стенки для лакросса; Мишени для бросков в лакроссе; Тренировочные манекены для лакросса
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Hockey sobre hierba y lacrosse > Material de entrenamiento de lacrosse: Sistemas de contención para lacrosse; Zapatillas de deporte de lacrosse; Rebotadores de lacrosse; Objetivos de tiro para lacrosse; Maniquíes de entrenamiento para lacrosse
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Hokej na travi i lacrosse > Pomagala za lacrosse trening: Sustavi za zaštitu za lacrosse; Trenažeri za lacrosse trening; Odbijajuća mreža za lacrosse trening; Mete za gađanje za lacrosse; Lutke za vježbanje za lacrosse
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Gyeplabda és lacrosse > Lacrosse-edzési segédeszközök: Lacrosse felfogóháló rendszerek; Lacrosse visszapattanó edzők; Lacrosse visszapattanók; Lacrosse kapucélpontok; Lacrosse gyakorlóbábuk
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Field Hockey & Lacrosse > Lacrosse Training Aids: Lacrosse Backstop Systems; Lacrosse Bounce-Back Trainers; Lacrosse Rebounders; Lacrosse Shooting Targets; Lacrosse Training Dummies
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Landhockey og Lacrosse > Læringsverktøy for lacrosse: Stoppnettsystemer for lacrosse; Bounce-back-trenere for lacrosse; Reboundere for lacrosse; Skuddblinker for lacrosse; Treningsdukker for lacrosse
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Pozemný hokej a lakros > Lakrosové tréningové pomôcky: Systémy zarážok pre lakros; Lakrosové trenažéry na odrážanie; Lakrosové odrazové siete; Strelecké terče na lakros; Lakrosové tréningové figuríny
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Hóquei de campo e lacrosse > Equipamentos de treinamento de lacrosse: Sistemas de contenção de lacrosse; Treinadores de rebote de lacrosse; Rebotes de lacrosse; Alvos de arremesso de lacrosse; Bonecos de treinamento de lacrosse
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Χόκεϊ επί χόρτου & λακρός > Προπονητικά βοηθήματα λακρός: Συστήματα ανάσχεσης λακρός; Προπονητές αναπήδησης λακρός; Προπονητικός εξοπλισμός αναπηδήσεων λακρός; Στόχοι ρίψης λακρός; Ομοιώματα προπόνησης λακρός
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Lacrosse og udendørs hockey > Træningsudstyr til lacrosse: Backstopsystemer til lacrosse; Lacrosse bounce-back trænere; Lacrosse rebounders; Skudmål til lacrosse; Træningsdukker til lacrosse
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 필드하키/라크로스 > 라크로스 훈련 장비: 라크로스 백스톱 시스템; 라크로스 바운스백 트레이너; 라크로스 리바운더; 라크로스 슈팅 타겟; 라크로스 훈련용 더미